Wisconsin, session 2025, SB441.
do enact as follows:SB441,11Section 1. 7.41 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:SB441,2,1327.41 (2) The chief inspector or municipal clerk may restrict the location of any 3individual exercising the right under sub. (1) to certain areas within a polling place, 4the clerk’s office, or alternate site under s. 6.855. The chief inspector or municipal 5clerk shall clearly designate observation areas for election observers under sub. (1). 6The observation areas shall be not less than 3 feet from nor more than 8 feet from 7the table at which electors announce their name and address to be issued a voter 8number at the polling place, office, or alternate site and not less than 3 feet from 9nor more than 8 feet from the table at which a person may register to vote at the 10polling place, office, or alternate site. The observation areas shall be so positioned 11to permit any election observer to readily observe all public aspects of the voting 12process. Any election official who violates this subsection may be imprisoned in the 13county jail for not more than 90 days or fined not more than $1,000 or both.SB441,214Section 2. 7.41 (4m) of the statutes is created to read:SB441,3,3157.41 (4m) The municipal clerk, chief inspector, and board of canvassers shall 16provide election observers uniform and nondiscriminatory access to all stages of the 17election process, including the certification of election technologies, absentee voting 1in person, canvassing, elector appeals, vote tabulation, and recounts. Any election 2official who violates this subsection may be imprisoned in the county jail for not 3more than 90 days or fined not more than $1,000 or both.SB441,34Section 3. 9.01 (1) (b) 11. of the statutes is amended to read:SB441,3,1259.01 (1) (b) 11. All steps of the recount shall be performed publicly and in 6accordance with s. 7.41. Except as provided in subd. 12., all materials and ballots 7may be viewed and identified by the candidates, the person demanding the recount 8and their authorized representatives and counsel, but only members of the board of 9canvassers and tabulators assisting them may touch any of the materials or ballots. 10The candidates, the person demanding the recount and their authorized 11representatives and counsel may object to the counting of any ballot. Any errors 12shall be corrected.SB441,3,1313